Virginia statutes. Title 63.2. Welfare (Social Services).
Article 1. General Provisions.
§ 63.2-1907.
Child support enforcement; private contracts.

Pursuant to the authority granted in §

63.2-1901

, child support enforcement field work administrative functions and central office payment processing functions in the Commonwealth may be performed by private entities. The Department shall supervise the administration of the child support enforcement program, let and monitor all contracts with private entities and ensure compliance with applicable state and federal laws and regulations. The Department may also enter into contracts with private collection agencies and other entities to effect the collection of child support arrearages. Contracts entered into pursuant to this section shall be in accordance with the applicable laws and regulations governing public entities pursuant to the Public Procurement Act (§

2.2-4300

et seq.). Any contract to perform child support enforcement field work administrative functions and central office payment processing functions entered into by the Department shall contain a provision that the entity to whom the contract is awarded shall give employment preference to qualified persons whose employment with the Division of Child Support Enforcement is terminated as a result of the privatization of child support enforcement functions. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, when hiring to fill vacant positions within the Department, preference shall be given to qualified persons who are unable to obtain employment with an entity who is awarded a contract to perform child support enforcement field work administrative functions and central office payment processing functions pursuant to this section and whose employment with the Division of Child Support Enforcement is terminated as a result of the privatization of child support enforcement functions.

The Board shall establish guidelines to implement the Department’s responsibilities under this section. Such guidelines shall specify procedures by which child support enforcement funding mechanisms authorized by state and federal law are allocated to fund central office and privatized child support enforcement functions.

History.

1996, c. 1054, § 63.1-249.1; 1998, cc. 494, 499; 2002, cc. 262, 747.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2002, c. 262 amended § 63.1-249.1, from which this section is derived. Pursuant to § 30-152, Acts 2002, c. 262 has been given effect in this section as set out above. The 2002 amendment by c. 262 deleted subsection C, which formerly read: “By July 1 of each year, the Department shall submit a written report to the Governor and General Assembly with a detailed summary and evaluation of the privatization of child support enforcement programs.”

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

14A M.J. Parent and Child, § 1.